Utah statutes.
3-1-1.1.   General corporation laws do not apply.

Title 16, Chapter 10a, Utah Revised Business Corporation Act, does not apply to domestic or foreign corporations governed by this chapter, except as specifically provided in Sections 3-1-13.4, 3-1-13.7, and 3-1-16.1.

